Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 3 History Commissions
13-3-207. Curtis H. Sykes Memorial Grant Program.

(a)

There is created the “Curtis H. Sykes Memorial Grant Program”, to be administered by the Black History Commission of Arkansas.

(b)

The program may provide grants to individuals to assist with:

(1)

Collecting materials bearing on the history of black Arkansans from the earliest times;

(2)

Encouraging historical work and research in the background of black Arkansans to help the young citizens of the state appreciate their heritage; and

(3)

Performing work in relation to the history of black Arkansans.

(c)(1)

The commission shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of the program.

(2)

The rules shall include:

(A)

The procedure for making an application for a grant;

(B)

The selection criteria for a grant;

(C)

The limitations on use of grant money; and

(D)

A procedure to provide for accountability of grant recipients and the monitoring of expenditures by grant recipients.

(d)

This section is contingent on the appropriation and availability of funding for the program.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 660, § 1.